dev/apertium-ne-en.ne.dix
    <pardef n="कर/्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाएँ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="मन__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>पर्दा</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>पर्ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="पढ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="impers"/><s n="infml"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाइने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ें</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="मिसाउ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नुहोस्</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="impers"/><s n="infml"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="राखि__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दिएँ</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="बग__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="जन्म__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दा</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="छाप/्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्ने</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िए</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="सोच/्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्न</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्नु</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्नुस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="impers"/><s n="infml"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दो</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दै</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दा</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्ने</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्नुपर्ने</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्न</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्नु</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्छु</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ौं</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दैछौ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्छौ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ौला</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="दिंद/ा__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ा<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="रह्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>यो</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="गरि__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दै</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दिने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>रहने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ए</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>रहे</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दिए</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दिएँ</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>रहेछु</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दिन्छु</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="वन/्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्ने</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्छस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाउँछस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="गरि"><i>गरि</i><par n="गरि__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="राखि"><i>राखि</i><par n="राखि__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="बग"><i>बग</i><par n="बग__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="छाप्"><i>छाप</i><par n="छाप/्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="फालि"><i>फालि</i><par n="राखि__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="रह्"><i>रह्</i><par n="रह्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="पाक"><i>पाक</i><par n="बग__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="मन"><i>मन</i><par n="मन__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="जन्म"><i>जन्म</i><par n="जन्म__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="वन्"><i>वन</i><par n="वन/्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="दिंदा"><i>दिंद</i><par n="दिंद/ा__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="सोच्"><i>सोच</i><par n="सोच/्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="पढ"><i>पढ</i><par n="पढ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="मिसाउ"><i>मिसाउ</i><par n="मिसाउ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="तुल्याउ"><i>तुल्याउ</i><par n="मिसाउ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="कर्"><i>कर</i><par n="कर/्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="हान्न"><i>हान्न</i><par n="बग__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="तोक्"><i>तोक</i><par n="छाप/्__vblex"/></e>
